Utah statutes.
75-2b-102.   Application.

This chapter applies to the disposition at death of the following property acquired by a married person:

(1)  all personal property, wherever situated:

(a)  which was acquired as or became, and remained, community property under the laws of another jurisdiction;

(b)  all or the proportionate part of that property acquired with the rents, issues, or income of, or the proceeds from, or in exchange for, that community property; or

(c)  traceable to that community property; and

(2)  all or the proportionate part of any real property situated in this state which was acquired with the rents, issues or income of, the proceeds from, or in exchange for, property acquired as or which became, and remained, community property under the laws of another jurisdiction, or property traceable to that community property.



Enacted by Chapter 132, 2012 General Session

